Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1802
Act, purpose.

The purpose of the American Indian Arts and Crafts Sales Act is protection of the consumer and protection of American Indian craftpersons from false representation in the offering for sale, sale, trade, or purchase of authentic American Indian arts and crafts and natural and unnatural turquoise.

Laws 1986, LB 275, § 2.